Wyoming, session 2026, HB0106.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1.
(a) The state forestry division of the office of
state lands and investments is authorized two (2) full-time
employee positions for purposes of this section. Of these
positions, one (1) shall be effective April 1, 2026 and one
(1) shall be effective April 1, 2027. The duties of the
positions shall be set by the state forester and
coordinated with the department of corrections, subject to
W.S. 7-16-202. It is the intent of the legislature that
the positions authorized in this subsection be included in
the office of state lands and investments' standard budget
for the immediately succeeding fiscal biennium.
(b) There is appropriated four hundred ninety-nine
thousand seven hundred nine dollars ($499,709.00) from the
general fund to the office of state lands and investments
for the purposes of the state forestry conservation inmate
crew program as provided in this subsection. Funds
appropriated in this subsection shall be for the positions
authorized in subsection (a) of this section and associated
costs including equipment, supplies, software, hardware and
telecommunications services. This appropriation shall be
for the period beginning with the effective date of this
act and ending June 30, 2028. This appropriation shall not
be transferred or expended for any other purpose and any
unexpended, unobligated funds remaining from this
appropriation shall revert as provided by law on June 30,
1

ORIGINAL HOUSE
BILL NO. HB0106
ENROLLED ACT NO. 6, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
2028. It is the intent of the legislature that, of this
appropriation, one hundred twenty-nine thousand two hundred
fifty-five dollars ($129,255.00) not be included in the
office of state lands and investments' standard budget for
the immediately succeeding fiscal biennium but that the
balance of the appropriation, as adjusted by the state
budget department for a twenty-four (24) month period, be
included in the standard budget for the immediately
succeeding fiscal biennium.
Section 2. This act is effective April 1, 2026.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the House.
Chief Clerk
2